Rhode Island statutes. Title 29 Libraries
Chapter 4 Free Public Libraries

29-4-1.
Founding by town or city.

The electors in any town, qualified to vote upon any proposition to impose a tax or for the expenditure of money in the town, voting at any financial town meeting, or in the case of any city, the city council, may appropriate such sum or sums as they shall deem proper for the foundation therein of a free public library, with or without branches, for all the inhabitants thereof, and to provide suitable rooms, land, buildings, and capital improvements for the library.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 36, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 46, § 5; P.L. 1914, ch. 1036, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 47, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 329, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

29-4-1

; P.L. 1964, ch. 233, § 2.

29-4-2.
Annual appropriations — Acceptance and management of donations.

Any town or city having established a free public library therein, in the manner described in §

29-4-1

, may annually, by the majority vote of the electors of the town qualified to vote and voting on the proposition, or by vote of the city council of the city, appropriate such sum or sums as it shall deem proper for the maintenance and increase of the library, and may take, receive, hold, and manage any devise, bequest, or donation for the establishment, maintenance, or increase of a public library therein. Any town or city may annually, in like manner, appropriate for the maintenance and increase of any free public library therein such sum or sums as may be deemed proper for the maintenance and increase of the free public library and for land, buildings, and capital improvements for such free public library.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 36, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 46, § 6; P.L. 1920, ch. 1838, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 47, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 329, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

29-4-2

; P.L. 1958, ch. 105, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 116, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 233, § 2.

29-4-3.
City or town appropriations.

Any town or city not owning a free public library may annually, by the majority vote of the electors of the town qualified to vote and voting on the proposition, or by vote of the city council of the city, appropriate such sum or sums as it shall deem proper for the maintenance and increase of any free public library therein and for land, buildings, and capital improvements for any free public library.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 36, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 46, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 47, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 329, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

29-4-3

; P.L. 1958, ch. 105, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 116, § 1; P.L. 1964; ch. 233, § 2.

29-4-4.
Gifts.

In case any library, or funds for the establishment thereof, may be offered to any city or town on the condition that the library shall be maintained as a free public library, the city council of any city, or town council of any town, is hereby authorized to accept this gift in behalf of the city or town.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 43, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 53, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 54, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 339, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

29-4-4

; P.L. 1964, ch. 233, § 2.

29-4-5.
Appointment of board of trustees.

Whenever any city or town shall establish a free public library, or shall become possessed, as provided in this chapter, of any free public library, the city council or town council, as the case may be, shall proceed to elect a board of trustees, to consist of not less than three (3) members nor more than seven (7). As soon as possible after the election of the first board, the members thereof shall meet and be divided by lot into three (3) groups or classes, the terms of office of one group expiring in one year from the date of their election, those of another group in two (2) years, and those of the remaining group in three (3) years. With the expiration of the term of office of any member, the vacancy shall be filled by the city council or town council, as the case may be, for the term of three (3) years. Vacancies occurring by resignation, removal, death, or otherwise, shall be filled as above for the unexpired term thereof.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 43, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 53, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 54, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 339, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

29-4-5

; P.L. 1964, ch. 233, § 2.

29-4-6.
Powers and duties of trustees.

The trustees shall take possession of the library, and shall, thereafter, be the legal guardians and custodians of the library. They shall provide suitable rooms for the library, arrange for the proper care of the library, choose one or more competent persons as librarians and fix their compensation, and make all needful rules and regulations for the government of the library and the use of the books; provided, that no fee for the use of the books shall ever be exacted.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 43, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 53, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 54, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 339, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

29-4-6

; P.L. 1964, ch. 233, § 2.

29-4-7.
Library funds.

All appropriations from the city or town and state, and the income of all funds belonging to the library, shall be subject to the exclusive control of the trustees, and the several city and town treasurers shall pay, within the limits of the appropriations and other library funds in their hands, all bills properly certified by the trustees.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 43, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 53, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 54, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 339, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

29-4-7

; P.L. 1964, ch. 233, § 2.

29-4-8.
Acceptance of gifts by trustees.

In case of any bequest, legacy, or gift to, or in favor of, a public library, the trustees thereof are hereby authorized and empowered to accept the bequest, legacy, or gift on behalf of, and for the use of, the library, and their receipt shall be a full and sufficient discharge and release to any executor, administrator, or other person authorized to make the payment thereof.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 43, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 53, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 54, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 339, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

29-4-8

; P.L. 1964, ch. 233, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 24.

29-4-9.
Naming of libraries in East Providence.

Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 7.4 of title 22, the city council of the city of East Providence shall be authorized to name all libraries within the city.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 490, § 1.